Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-1108
Individual records; maintenance requirements; periodic reports.

(1) The department shall set requirements for the maintenance of the individual records of committed offenders assigned to a community work release and reentry center.

(2) The department shall require each community work release and reentry center to make periodic reports to the department on the performance of each committed offender assigned to the center.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 65.